Utah statutes.
79-4-401.   Funds to be appropriated -- Boating account expenses.

(1)  The Legislature shall appropriate such funds as from time to time necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter to the division to be used by the division in the administration of the powers and duties and in carrying out the objective and purposes prescribed by this chapter.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that all departmental operating and administrative expenses for the administration of the boating account of the division shall be charged against that account.

